Hawaii statutes.
[§132-19] Aerial luminaries; prohibited. (a)
It shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, distribute, possess, ignite, or
otherwise use aerial luminaries, commonly known as sky lanterns, Hawaii
lanterns, and flying luminaries.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year
or fined not more than $1,000, or both, for each violation.

(c) As used in this section, "aerial
luminary" means an airborne paper lantern containing a small candle, or
other device for fuel, that heats air from inside the lantern causing the
lantern to rise into the air and remain airborne until the candle or other
device extinguishes. [L 2012, c 319, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 132D but was
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next